Vermont statutes. Title 29 Public Property and Supplies
Subchapter 7. Miscellaneous

§ 561.
Release of oil and gas leases.

After the expiration, cancellation, surrender, or relinquishment of an oil and gas lease, upon written request of the lessor, the lessee shall file a release or discharge of the lease in the land records of the town or towns where the lands described in the lease are located. The filing shall be in recordable form and shall include any fees.

If any lessee, his or her personal representative, successor, or assign fails or refuses to record a release for a period of 30 days after being so requested, he or she shall be liable for all damages occasioned thereby, including costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.

A lessor’s request for release or discharge shall be in writing and delivered to the lessee by personal service or registered mail at his or her last known address.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 562.
Subdivision of land subject to an oil and gas lease.

Unless the parties agree in writing to the contrary, if ownership of any land subject to an oil and gas lease is thereafter subdivided into separate interests, the land shall be developed and operated for oil and gas purposes as an entirety and the rentals and royalties shall be divided and paid to the separate owners in the proportion that the acreage or interest owned bears to the entire leased acreage.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 563.
Abandonment of oil and gas interests; preservation.

An abandoned interest in oil and gas shall revert to and merge with the surface estate from which it was severed.

An interest in oil and gas is deemed abandoned at any time that:

it has been unused for a continuous period of 10 years after July 1, 1973; and

no statement of interest under subsection (e) of this section has been filed at any time within the preceding five years.

The provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to any interest in oil or gas that has been retained by the owner who originally severed the mineral estate from the surface estate, notwithstanding that other interests in the land, including ownership of the surface, may have been sold, leased, mortgaged, or otherwise transferred.

This section applies to all interests in oil and gas. It also applies to interests in other minerals if created inclusively in the same instrument which expressly creates an oil and gas interest. It does not apply to mineral interests that do not expressly include an oil and gas interest or were intended to be separate from an oil and gas interest.

An interest in oil and gas is deemed used at any time in which:

there is actual production of oil or gas, including production from lands covered by a lease to which an oil and gas interest is subject, or from lands pooled or unitized with such lands; or

oil and gas operations are conducted under the terms of the instrument creating the oil and gas interest; or

payment is made of rental or royalties for the purpose of delaying the use or continuing the use of the oil and gas interest; or

payment of taxes is made on the oil and gas interest; or

there exists a currently valid permit under 10 V.S.A. chapter 151 or a currently valid drilling permit under this chapter for development of the oil and gas interest.

The owner of an interest in oil or gas may file a statement of interest in the land records of any municipality in which the land affected is located. The statement shall include a description of the land affected, the nature of the interest claimed, the book and page of recording of the original grant of the interest, and the name and address of the person claiming the interest.

The owner of the surface estate from which an oil and gas interest was severed may give notice of abandonment under this subsection. Notice shall contain the name of the record owner of the interest, a description of the land and the nature of the interest, the book and page of filing of the interest, if it is filed, the name and address of the person giving notice, and a statement that the interest is presumed abandoned. The notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the town or towns where the land affected is located. If the address of the owner of the oil and gas interest is shown on record, a copy of the notice shall be mailed to that address by certified or registered mail within 10 days after the date of publication.

A copy of the notice under subsection (g) of this section, and an affidavit, may be filed in the land records of the municipality in which the land is located. The affidavit shall state that the oil or gas interest has been abandoned under the criteria set forth in subsection (b) of this section, and that notice of abandonment has been given under subsection (g). After the notice and affidavit have been filed, unless a court finds to the contrary, the oil and gas interest shall be presumed abandoned, and the interest of the surface owner shall be presumed for all purposes free of encumbrance from that interest.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982; amended

2017, No. 24

, § 2, eff. May 4, 2017.

§ 564.
Surface use value appraisal of agriculture and forestlands.

In order to support and encourage the accomplishment of the purposes set forth in

32 V.S.A. § 3751

, the eligibility of agricultural land and managed forestland for use value appraisal shall not be denied solely by the leasing or development of the subsurface of those lands for oil and gas exploration and production.
However, those lands shall nevertheless be required to meet the criteria contained in 32 V.S.A. chapter 124 and the rules adopted by the Current Use Advisory Board.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 565.
Governor authorized to join in interstate compact.

The Governor, in the name of the State, may join with the other states in the Interstate Compact to Conserve Oil and Gas. This compact was executed in Dallas, Texas, on February 16, 1935, has been extended, with the consent of Congress on October 14, 1976 by Public Law 94-493, and said compact and all extensions are now on deposit with the Department of State of the United States.

The Governor, in the name of the State, may execute agreements for the further extension of the expiration date of that interstate compact to conserve oil and gas and to determine if and when it shall be to the best interest of this State to withdraw from said compact upon 60 days’ notice as provided by its terms. If he or she determines that the State shall withdraw from said compact, he or she may give necessary notice and take any and all steps necessary and proper to effect the withdrawal.

The Governor shall be the official representative of the State in the Compact to Conserve Oil and Gas, and shall exercise and perform for the State all of the powers and duties as such; provided, however, that the assistant representative who shall act in his or her stead as the official representative of the State shall be the Chair of the Board.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 566.
Construction.

This chapter shall be liberally construed so as to effect the purposes set forth in section 502 of this chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall supersede all local laws and regulations relating to oil and gas development insofar as they may specify performance standards, methods, materials, procedures, or equipment to be used by a well operator.

The provisions of this chapter shall not supersede local laws and regulations that provide for:

specific uses permitted or prohibited in land use or zoning districts;

other matters not fully covered by State law, regulation, or rule of the Board, to the extent that local regulation does not conflict or interfere with State regulation.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.